en: 10% less sugar
bg: 10% по-малко захар
de: 10% weniger Zucker
es: 10% menos de azúcar
fi: 10% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 10% de sucre, -10% de sucre, 10% de sucre en moins
hr: 10% manje šećera
hu: 10%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 10% in meno di zucchero
nl: 10% minder suiker
pt: 10% menos açúcar, -10% menos açúcar, menos 10% açúcar, 10% menos de açúcar, -10% menos de açúcar, menos 10% de açúcar

en: 15% less sugar
bg: 15% по-малко захар
de: 15% weniger Zucker
es: 15% menos de azúcar
fi: 15% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 15% de sucre, -15% de sucre, 15% de sucre en moins
hr: 15% manje šećera
hu: 15%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 15% in meno di zucchero
nl: 15% minder suiker
pt: 15% menos açúcar, -15% menos açúcar, menos 15% açúcar, 15% menos de açúcar, -15% menos de açúcar, menos 15% de açúcar

en: 20% less sugar
bg: 20% по-малко захар
de: 20% weniger Zucker
es: 20% menos de azúcar
fi: 20% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 20% de sucre, -20% de sucre, 20% de sucre en moins
hr: 20% manje šećera
hu: 20%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 20% in meno di zucchero
nl: 20% minder suiker
pt: 20% menos açúcar, -20% menos açúcar, menos 20% açúcar, 20% menos de açúcar, -20% menos de açúcar, menos 20% de açúcar

en: 25% less sugar
bg: 25% по-малко захар
de: 25% weniger Zucker
es: 25% menos de azúcar
fi: 25% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 25% de sucre, -25% de sucre, 25% de sucre en moins
he: 25% פחות סוכר
hr: 25% manje šećera
hu: 25%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 25% in meno di zucchero
nl: 25% minder suiker
pt: 25% menos açúcar, -25% menos açúcar, menos 25% açúcar, 25% menos de açúcar, -25% menos de açúcar, menos 25% de açúcar

en: 30% less sugar
bg: 30% по-малко захар
ca: 30% menys de sucre
de: 30% weniger Zucker
es: 30% menos de azúcar
fi: 30% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 30% de sucre, -30% de sucre, 30% de sucre en moins
he: 30% פחות סוכר
hr: 30% manje šećera
hu: 30%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 30% in meno di zucchero
nl: 30% minder suiker
pl: 30% mniej dodatku cukru, 30% mniej cukru
pt: 30% menos açúcar, -30% menos açúcar, menos 30% açúcar, 30% menos de açúcar, -30% menos de açúcar, menos 30% de açúcar
th: น้ำตาลน้อยลง 30%

en: 35% less sugar
bg: 35% по-малко захар
de: 35% weniger Zucker
es: 35% menos de azúcar
fi: 35% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 35% de sucre, -35% de sucre, 35% de sucre en moins
he: 35% פחות סוכר
hr: 35% manje šećera
hu: 35%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 35% in meno di zucchero
nl: 35% minder suiker
pt: 35% menos açúcar, -35% menos açúcar, menos 35% açúcar, 35% menos de açúcar, -35% menos de açúcar, menos 35% de açúcar

en: 40% less sugar
bg: 40% по-малко захар
de: 40% weniger Zucker
es: 40% menos de azúcar
fi: 40% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 40% de sucre, -40% de sucre, 40% de sucre en moins
he: 40% פחות סוכר
hr: 40% manje šećera
hu: 40%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 40% in meno di zucchero
nl: 40% minder suiker
pt: 40% menos açúcar, -40% menos açúcar, menos 40% açúcar, 40% menos de açúcar, -40% menos de açúcar, menos 40% de açúcar

en: 45% less sugar
bg: 45% по-малко захар
de: 45% weniger Zucker
es: 45% menos de azúcar
fi: 45% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 45% de sucre, -45% de sucre, 45% de sucre en moins
he: 45% פחות סוכר
hr: 45% manje šećera
hu: 45%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 45% in meno di zucchero
nl: 45% minder suiker
pt: 45% menos açúcar, -45% menos açúcar, menos 45% açúcar, 45% menos de açúcar, -45% menos de açúcar, menos 45% de açúcar

en: 50% less sugar
bg: 50% по-малко захар
de: 50% weniger Zucker
es: 50% menos de azúcar
fi: 50% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 50% de sucre, -50% de sucre, 50% de sucre en moins
he: 50% פחות סוכר
hr: 50% manje šećera
hu: 50%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 50% in meno di zucchero
nl: 50% minder suiker
pt: 50% menos açúcar, -50% menos açúcar, menos 50% açúcar, 50% menos de açúcar, -50% menos de açúcar, menos 50% de açúcar

en: 55% less sugar
bg: 55% по-малко захар
de: 55% weniger Zucker
es: 55% menos de azúcar
fi: 55% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 55% de sucre, -55% de sucre, 55% de sucre en moins
hr: 55% manje šećera
hu: 55%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 55% in meno di zucchero
pt: 55% menos açúcar, -55% menos açúcar, menos 55% açúcar, 55% menos de açúcar, -55% menos de açúcar, menos 55% de açúcar

en: 60% less sugar
bg: 60% по-малко захар
de: 60% weniger Zucker
es: 60% menos de azúcar
fi: 60% vähemmän sokeria
fr: Moins 60% de sucre, -60% de sucre, 60% de sucre en moins
he: 60% פחות סוכר
hr: 60% manje šećera
hu: 60%-al csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: 60% in meno di zucchero
pt: 60% menos açúcar, -60% menos açúcar, menos 60% açúcar, 60% menos de açúcar, -60% menos de açúcar, menos 60% de açúcar

en: No added sugar, no sugar added, no added sugars
xx: no added sugar
ar: بدون سكر مضاف
bg: Без добавена захар
ca: Sense sucre afegit, sense sucres afegits
cs: Bez přidaného cukru, obsahuje přirozeněse vyskytující cukry
da: Uden tilsat sukker, ikke tilsat sukker
de: Ohne Zuckerzusatz, Ohne zugesetzten Zucker, Enthält von Natur aus Zucker
el: Χωρίς προσθήκη ζάχαρης
es: Sin azúcares añadidos, 0% Azúcares añadidos, Sin azúcar añadido
et: Ilma lisatud suhkruta
fa: بدون شکر افزوده
fi: ei lisättyä sokeria, ilman lisättyä sokeria, ei lisättyjä sokereita
fr: Sans sucre ajouté, sans sucres ajoutés, sans ajout de sucre
he: ללא תוספת סוכר
hi: बिना अतिरिक्त चीनी
hr: bez dodanog šećera, bez dodatnih šećera, bez dodanih šećera, sadrži prirodno prisutne šećere, sadrži prirodne šećere
hu: Hozzáadott cukor nélkül, Nincs hozzáadott cukor, hozzáadott cukrot nem tartalmaz
id: Tanpa tambahan gula
it: Senza zuccheri aggiunti
ja: 砂糖不使用
ko: 설탕 무첨가
lt: Be pridėtinio cukraus
lv: Bez pievienota cukura
ms: Tiada tambahan gula
nl: Zonder toegevoegde suikers, Geen suiker toegevoegd
pl: Bez dodatku cukru
pt: Sem açúcares adicionados, sem adição de açúcares, sem açúcar adicionado, sem adição de açúcar
ro: Fără zahăr adăugat
ru: Без добавления сахара
sk: Bez pridaného cukru
sl: Brez dodanega sladkorja, obsahuje prírodné cukry, brez dodanih sladkorjev, vsebuje naravno prisotne sladkorje
sq: Pa sheqer të shtuar
sr: Без додатог шећера
sv: Inget tillsat socker, Utan tillsatt socker
th: ไม่เติมน้ำตาล
tr: İlave şeker içermez
uk: Без додавання цукру
vi: Không thêm đường
zh: 无添糖

en: No sugar, sugar-free
xx: no sugar
bg: Без захар
ca: Sense sucre, lliure de sucre
da: sukkerfri, sukkerfrit, sukkerfrie, uden sukker
de: Ohne Zucker
es: Sin azúcar, Libre de azúcar, Cero azúcar, sin azúcares
fi: sokeriton, ei sokeria
fr: Sans sucre, Zero sucre
he: ללא סוכר, נטול סוכר
hr: bez šećera
hu: Cukormentes, Minimális cukortartalom
it: Senza zucchero
nl: Suikervrij, Zonder suiker
pl: Bez cukru, Nie zawiera cukru
pt: Sem açúcar, sem açúcares
ru: Без сахара
sv: Sockerfri, Sockerfritt, Sockerfria, Utan socker
th: ไม่มีน้ำตาล
tr: Şekersiz

en: No carbohydrates, No carbs
sv: Inga kolhydrater

en: Lowers cholesterol
bg: Намалява холестерола
de: Cholesterinsenkend
es: Reduce el colesterol
fi: kolesterolia alentava, laskee kolesterolia
fr: Réduit le cholesterol
he: מפחית כולסטרול
hu: Csökkenti a koleszterinszintet
it: Abbassa il colesterolo
nl: Weinig cholesterol
pl: Obniża cholesterol
pt: Reduz o colesterol

en: From California, Californian
da: fra Californien
de: Kalifornische
fr: californiens
hr: kalifornijske
it: della California
sv: från Kalifornien, kalifornisk, kaliforniska

de: 100% Milch aus Österreich
xx: 100% Milch aus Österreich

en: Australian made
bg: Произведено в Австралия
ca: Fet a Austràlia
de: In Australien gemacht
es: Fabricado en Australia
fi: valmistettu Australiassa
fr: Fabriqué en Australie
he: בייצור אוסטרלי
hu: Ausztráliában készült
it: Prodotto in Australia
nl: Geproduceerd in Australië
pt: Fabricado na Austrália, feito na Austrália, produto da Austrália, produzido na Austrália, originário da Austrália, proveniente da Austrália

bs: Proizvodeno u Bosni i Hercegovinu
xx: Proizvodeno u Bosni i Hercegovinu

es: Hecho en Argentina
en: Made in Argentina
fr: Fabriqué en Argentine
pt: Feito na Argentina